ckb/dictionaries/ckb.aff
PFX T Y 830
PFX T 0 ب .
PFX T 0 مە .
PFX T 0 دە .
PFX T 0 ئە .
PFX T 0 پێ .
PFX T 0 پێک .
PFX T 0 تێ .
PFX T 0 تێک .
PFX T 0 دا .
PFX T 0 دەر .
PFX T 0 ڕا .
PFX T 0 سەر .
PFX T 0 لێ .
PFX T 0 هەڵ .
PFX T 0 وێ .
PFX T 0 وەر .
PFX T 0 ڕۆ .
PFX T 0 بەر .
PFX T 0 وێک .
PFX T 0 لێک .
PFX T 0 نەم .
PFX T 0 نەت .
PFX T 0 نەی .
PFX T 0 نەمان .
PFX T 0 نەتان .
PFX T 0 نەیان .
PFX T 0 دەم .
PFX T 0 دەت .
PFX T 0 دەی .
PFX T 0 دەمان .
PFX T 0 دەتان .
PFX T 0 دەیان .
PFX T 0 ئەم .
PFX T 0 ئەت .
PFX T 0 ئەی .
PFX T 0 ئەمان .
PFX T 0 ئەتان .
PFX T 0 ئەیان .
PFX T 0 نەمدە .
PFX T 0 نەمئە .
PFX T 0 نەتدە .
PFX T 0 نەتئە .
PFX T 0 نەیدە .
PFX T 0 نەیئە .
PFX T 0 نەماندە .
PFX T 0 نەمانئە .
PFX T 0 نەتاندە .
PFX T 0 نەتانئە .
PFX T 0 نەیاندە .
PFX T 0 نەیانئە .
PFX T 0 پێم .
PFX T 0 پێت .
PFX T 0 پێی .
PFX T 0 پێمان .
PFX T 0 پێتان .
PFX T 0 پێیان .
PFX T 0 پێکم .
PFX T 0 پێکت .
PFX T 0 پێکی .
PFX T 0 پێکمان .
PFX T 0 پێکتان .
PFX T 0 پێکیان .
PFX T 0 تێم .
PFX T 0 تێت .
PFX T 0 تێی .
PFX T 0 تێمان .
PFX T 0 تێتان .
PFX T 0 تێیان .
PFX T 0 تێکم .
PFX T 0 تێکت .
PFX T 0 تێکی .
PFX T 0 تێکمان .
PFX T 0 تێکتان .
PFX T 0 تێکیان .
PFX T 0 دام .
PFX T 0 دات .
PFX T 0 دای .
PFX T 0 دامان .
PFX T 0 داتان .
PFX T 0 دایان .
PFX T 0 ڕام .
PFX T 0 ڕات .
PFX T 0 ڕای .
PFX T 0 ڕامان .
PFX T 0 ڕاتان .
PFX T 0 ڕایان .
PFX T 0 سەرم .
PFX T 0 سەرت .
PFX T 0 سەری .
PFX T 0 سەرمان .
PFX T 0 سەرتان .
PFX T 0 سەریان .
PFX T 0 لێم .
PFX T 0 لێت .
PFX T 0 لێی .
PFX T 0 لێمان .
PFX T 0 لێتان .
PFX T 0 لێیان .
PFX T 0 هەڵم .
PFX T 0 هەڵت .
PFX T 0 هەڵی .
PFX T 0 هەڵمان .
PFX T 0 هەڵتان .
PFX T 0 هەڵیان .
PFX T 0 وێم .
PFX T 0 وێت .
PFX T 0 وێی .
PFX T 0 وێمان .
PFX T 0 وێتان .
PFX T 0 وێیان .
PFX T 0 وەرم .
PFX T 0 وەرت .
PFX T 0 وەری .
PFX T 0 وەرمان .
PFX T 0 وەرتان .
PFX T 0 وەریان .
PFX T 0 ڕۆم .
PFX T 0 ڕۆت .
PFX T 0 ڕۆی .
PFX T 0 ڕۆمان .
PFX T 0 ڕۆتان .
PFX T 0 ڕۆیان .
PFX T 0 بەرم .
PFX T 0 بەرت .
PFX T 0 بەری .
PFX T 0 بەرمان .
PFX T 0 بەرتان .
PFX T 0 بەریان .
PFX T 0 وێکم .
PFX T 0 وێکت .
PFX T 0 وێکی .
PFX T 0 وێکمان .
PFX T 0 وێکتان .
PFX T 0 وێکیان .
PFX T 0 لێکم .
PFX T 0 لێکت .
PFX T 0 لێکی .
PFX T 0 لێکمان .
PFX T 0 لێکتان .
PFX T 0 لێکیان .
PFX T 0 پێمدە .
PFX T 0 پێمئە .
PFX T 0 پێتدە .
PFX T 0 پێتئە .
PFX T 0 پێیدە .
PFX T 0 پێیئە .
PFX T 0 پێماندە .
PFX T 0 پێمانئە .
PFX T 0 پێتاندە .
PFX T 0 پێتانئە .
PFX T 0 پێیاندە .
PFX T 0 پێیانئە .
PFX T 0 پێکمدە .
PFX T 0 پێکمئە .
PFX T 0 پێکتدە .
PFX T 0 پێکتئە .
PFX T 0 پێکیدە .
PFX T 0 پێکیئە .
PFX T 0 پێکماندە .
PFX T 0 پێکمانئە .
PFX T 0 پێکتاندە .
PFX T 0 پێکتانئە .
PFX T 0 پێکیاندە .
PFX T 0 پێکیانئە .
PFX T 0 تێمدە .
PFX T 0 تێمئە .
PFX T 0 تێتدە .
PFX T 0 تێتئە .
PFX T 0 تێیدە .
PFX T 0 تێیئە .
PFX T 0 تێماندە .
PFX T 0 تێمانئە .
PFX T 0 تێتاندە .
PFX T 0 تێتانئە .
PFX T 0 تێیاندە .
PFX T 0 تێیانئە .
PFX T 0 تێکمدە .
PFX T 0 تێکمئە .
PFX T 0 تێکتدە .
PFX T 0 تێکتئە .
PFX T 0 تێکیدە .
PFX T 0 تێکیئە .
PFX T 0 تێکماندە .
PFX T 0 تێکمانئە .
PFX T 0 تێکتاندە .
PFX T 0 تێکتانئە .
PFX T 0 تێکیاندە .
PFX T 0 تێکیانئە .
PFX T 0 دامدە .
PFX T 0 دامئە .
PFX T 0 داتدە .
PFX T 0 داتئە .
PFX T 0 دایدە .
PFX T 0 دایئە .
PFX T 0 داماندە .
PFX T 0 دامانئە .
PFX T 0 داتاندە .
PFX T 0 داتانئە .
PFX T 0 دایاندە .
PFX T 0 دایانئە .
PFX T 0 دەرمدە .
PFX T 0 دەرمئە .
PFX T 0 دەرتدە .
PFX T 0 دەرتئە .
PFX T 0 دەریدە .
PFX T 0 دەریئە .
PFX T 0 دەرماندە .
PFX T 0 دەرمانئە .
PFX T 0 دەرتاندە .
PFX T 0 دەرتانئە .
PFX T 0 دەریاندە .
PFX T 0 دەریانئە .
PFX T 0 ڕامدە .
PFX T 0 ڕامئە .
PFX T 0 ڕاتدە .
PFX T 0 ڕاتئە .
PFX T 0 ڕایدە .
PFX T 0 ڕایئە .
PFX T 0 ڕاماندە .
PFX T 0 ڕامانئە .
PFX T 0 ڕاتاندە .
PFX T 0 ڕاتانئە .
PFX T 0 ڕایاندە .
PFX T 0 ڕایانئە .
PFX T 0 سەرمدە .
PFX T 0 سەرمئە .
PFX T 0 سەرتدە .
PFX T 0 سەرتئە .
PFX T 0 سەریدە .
PFX T 0 سەریئە .
PFX T 0 سەرماندە .
PFX T 0 سەرمانئە .
PFX T 0 سەرتاندە .
PFX T 0 سەرتانئە .
PFX T 0 سەریاندە .
PFX T 0 سەریانئە .
PFX T 0 بەرمدە .
PFX T 0 بەرمئە .
PFX T 0 بەرتدە .
PFX T 0 بەرتئە .
PFX T 0 بەریدە .
PFX T 0 بەریئە .
PFX T 0 بەرماندە .
PFX T 0 بەرمانئە .
PFX T 0 بەرتاندە .
PFX T 0 بەرتانئە .
PFX T 0 بەریاندە .
PFX T 0 بەریانئە .
PFX T 0 لێمدە .
PFX T 0 لێمئە .
PFX T 0 لێتدە .
PFX T 0 لێتئە .
PFX T 0 لێیدە .
PFX T 0 لێیئە .
PFX T 0 لێماندە .
PFX T 0 لێمانئە .
PFX T 0 لێتاندە .
PFX T 0 لێتانئە .
PFX T 0 لێیاندە .
PFX T 0 لێیانئە .
PFX T 0 هەڵمدە .
PFX T 0 هەڵمئە .
PFX T 0 هەڵتدە .
PFX T 0 هەڵتئە .
PFX T 0 هەڵیدە .
PFX T 0 هەڵیئە .
PFX T 0 هەڵماندە .
PFX T 0 هەڵمانئە .
PFX T 0 هەڵتاندە .
PFX T 0 هەڵتانئە .
PFX T 0 هەڵیاندە .
PFX T 0 هەڵیانئە .
PFX T 0 وێمدە .
PFX T 0 وێمئە .
PFX T 0 وێتدە .
PFX T 0 وێتئە .
PFX T 0 وێیدە .
PFX T 0 وێیئە .
PFX T 0 وێماندە .
PFX T 0 وێمانئە .
PFX T 0 وێتاندە .
PFX T 0 وێتانئە .
PFX T 0 وێیاندە .
PFX T 0 وێیانئە .
PFX T 0 وەرمدە .
PFX T 0 وەرمئە .
PFX T 0 وەرتدە .
PFX T 0 وەرتئە .
PFX T 0 وەریدە .
PFX T 0 وەریئە .
PFX T 0 وەرماندە .
PFX T 0 وەرمانئە .
PFX T 0 وەرتاندە .
PFX T 0 وەرتانئە .
PFX T 0 وەریاندە .
PFX T 0 وەریانئە .
PFX T 0 ڕۆمدە .
PFX T 0 ڕۆمئە .
PFX T 0 ڕۆتدە .
PFX T 0 ڕۆتئە .
PFX T 0 ڕۆیدە .
PFX T 0 ڕۆیئە .
PFX T 0 ڕۆماندە .
PFX T 0 ڕۆمانئە .
PFX T 0 ڕۆتاندە .
PFX T 0 ڕۆتانئە .
PFX T 0 ڕۆیاندە .
PFX T 0 ڕۆیانئە .
PFX T 0 وێکمدە .
PFX T 0 وێکمئە .
PFX T 0 وێکتدە .
PFX T 0 وێکتئە .
PFX T 0 وێکیدە .
PFX T 0 وێکیئە .
PFX T 0 وێکماندە .
PFX T 0 وێکمانئە .
PFX T 0 وێکتاندە .
PFX T 0 وێکتانئە .
PFX T 0 وێکیاندە .
PFX T 0 وێکیانئە .
PFX T 0 لێکمدە .
PFX T 0 لێکمئە .
PFX T 0 لێکتدە .
PFX T 0 لێکتئە .
PFX T 0 لێکیدە .
PFX T 0 لێکیئە .
PFX T 0 لێکماندە .
PFX T 0 لێکمانئە .
PFX T 0 لێکتاندە .
PFX T 0 لێکتانئە .
PFX T 0 لێکیاندە .
PFX T 0 لێکیانئە .
PFX T 0 پێمنە .
PFX T 0 پێتنە .
PFX T 0 پێینە .
PFX T 0 پێماننە .
PFX T 0 پێتاننە .
PFX T 0 پێیاننە .
PFX T 0 پێکمنە .
PFX T 0 پێکتنە .
PFX T 0 پێکینە .
PFX T 0 پێکماننە .
PFX T 0 پێکتاننە .
PFX T 0 پێکیاننە .
PFX T 0 تێمنە .
PFX T 0 تێتنە .
PFX T 0 تێینە .
PFX T 0 تێماننە .
PFX T 0 تێتاننە .
PFX T 0 تێیاننە .
PFX T 0 تێکمنە .
PFX T 0 تێکتنە .
PFX T 0 تێکینە .
PFX T 0 تێکماننە .
PFX T 0 تێکتاننە .
PFX T 0 تێکیاننە .
PFX T 0 دامنە .
PFX T 0 داتنە .
PFX T 0 داینە .
PFX T 0 داماننە .
PFX T 0 داتاننە .
PFX T 0 دایاننە .
PFX T 0 دەرمنە .
PFX T 0 دەرتنە .
PFX T 0 دەرینە .
PFX T 0 دەرماننە .
PFX T 0 دەرتاننە .
PFX T 0 دەریاننە .
PFX T 0 ڕامنە .
PFX T 0 ڕاتنە .
PFX T 0 ڕاینە .
PFX T 0 ڕاماننە .
PFX T 0 ڕاتاننە .
PFX T 0 ڕایاننە .
PFX T 0 سەرمنە .
PFX T 0 سەرتنە .
PFX T 0 سەرینە .
PFX T 0 سەرماننە .
PFX T 0 سەرتاننە .
PFX T 0 سەریاننە .
PFX T 0 بەرمنە .
PFX T 0 بەرتنە .
PFX T 0 بەرینە .
PFX T 0 بەرماننە .
PFX T 0 بەرتاننە .
PFX T 0 بەریاننە .
PFX T 0 لێمنە .
PFX T 0 لێتنە .
PFX T 0 لێینە .
PFX T 0 لێماننە .
PFX T 0 لێتاننە .
PFX T 0 لێیاننە .
PFX T 0 هەڵمنە .
PFX T 0 هەڵتنە .
PFX T 0 هەڵینە .
PFX T 0 هەڵماننە .
PFX T 0 هەڵتاننە .
PFX T 0 هەڵیاننە .
PFX T 0 وێمنە .
PFX T 0 وێتنە .
PFX T 0 وێینە .
PFX T 0 وێماننە .
PFX T 0 وێتاننە .
PFX T 0 وێیاننە .
PFX T 0 وەرمنە .
PFX T 0 وەرتنە .
PFX T 0 وەرینە .
PFX T 0 وەرماننە .
PFX T 0 وەرتاننە .
PFX T 0 وەریاننە .
PFX T 0 ڕۆمنە .
PFX T 0 ڕۆتنە .
PFX T 0 ڕۆینە .
PFX T 0 ڕۆماننە .
PFX T 0 ڕۆتاننە .
PFX T 0 ڕۆیاننە .
PFX T 0 وێکمنە .
PFX T 0 وێکتنە .
PFX T 0 وێکینە .
PFX T 0 وێکماننە .
PFX T 0 وێکتاننە .
PFX T 0 وێکیاننە .
PFX T 0 لێکمنە .
PFX T 0 لێکتنە .
PFX T 0 لێکینە .
PFX T 0 لێکماننە .
PFX T 0 لێکتاننە .
PFX T 0 لێکیاننە .
PFX T 0 پێمنەدە .
PFX T 0 پێمنەئە .
PFX T 0 پێتنەدە .
PFX T 0 پێتنەئە .
PFX T 0 پێینەدە .
PFX T 0 پێینەئە .
PFX T 0 پێماننەدە .
PFX T 0 پێماننەئە .
PFX T 0 پێتاننەدە .
PFX T 0 پێتاننەئە .
PFX T 0 پێیاننەدە .
PFX T 0 پێیاننەئە .
PFX T 0 پێکمنەدە .
PFX T 0 پێکمنەئە .
PFX T 0 پێکتنەدە .
PFX T 0 پێکتنەئە .
PFX T 0 پێکینەدە .
PFX T 0 پێکینەئە .
PFX T 0 پێکماننەدە .
PFX T 0 پێکماننەئە .
PFX T 0 پێکتاننەدە .
PFX T 0 پێکتاننەئە .
PFX T 0 پێکیاننەدە .
PFX T 0 پێکیاننەئە .
PFX T 0 تێمنەدە .
PFX T 0 تێمنەئە .
PFX T 0 تێتنەدە .
PFX T 0 تێتنەئە .
PFX T 0 تێینەدە .
PFX T 0 تێینەئە .
PFX T 0 تێماننەدە .
PFX T 0 تێماننەئە .
PFX T 0 تێتاننەدە .
PFX T 0 تێتاننەئە .
PFX T 0 تێیاننەدە .
PFX T 0 تێیاننەئە .
PFX T 0 تێکمنەدە .
PFX T 0 تێکمنەئە .
PFX T 0 تێکتنەدە .
PFX T 0 تێکتنەئە .
PFX T 0 تێکینەدە .
PFX T 0 تێکینەئە .
PFX T 0 تێکماننەدە .
PFX T 0 تێکماننەئە .
PFX T 0 تێکتاننەدە .
PFX T 0 تێکتاننەئە .
PFX T 0 تێکیاننەدە .
PFX T 0 تێکیاننەئە .
PFX T 0 دامنەدە .
PFX T 0 دامنەئە .
PFX T 0 داتنەدە .
PFX T 0 داتنەئە .
PFX T 0 داینەدە .
PFX T 0 داینەئە .
PFX T 0 داماننەدە .
PFX T 0 داماننەئە .
PFX T 0 داتاننەدە .
PFX T 0 داتاننەئە .
PFX T 0 دایاننەدە .
PFX T 0 دایاننەئە .
PFX T 0 دەرمنەدە .
PFX T 0 دەرمنەئە .
PFX T 0 دەرتنەدە .
PFX T 0 دەرتنەئە .
PFX T 0 دەرینەدە .
PFX T 0 دەرینەئە .
PFX T 0 دەرماننەدە .
PFX T 0 دەرماننەئە .
PFX T 0 دەرتاننەدە .
PFX T 0 دەرتاننەئە .
PFX T 0 دەریاننەدە .
PFX T 0 دەریاننەئە .
PFX T 0 ڕامنەدە .
PFX T 0 ڕامنەئە .
PFX T 0 ڕاتنەدە .
PFX T 0 ڕاتنەئە .
PFX T 0 ڕاینەدە .
PFX T 0 ڕاینەئە .
PFX T 0 ڕاماننەدە .
PFX T 0 ڕاماننەئە .
PFX T 0 ڕاتاننەدە .
PFX T 0 ڕاتاننەئە .
PFX T 0 ڕایاننەدە .
PFX T 0 ڕایاننەئە .
PFX T 0 سەرمنەدە .
PFX T 0 سەرمنەئە .
PFX T 0 سەرتنەدە .
PFX T 0 سەرتنەئە .
PFX T 0 سەرینەدە .
PFX T 0 سەرینەئە .
PFX T 0 سەرماننەدە .
PFX T 0 سەرماننەئە .
PFX T 0 سەرتاننەدە .
PFX T 0 سەرتاننەئە .
PFX T 0 سەریاننەدە .
PFX T 0 سەریاننەئە .
PFX T 0 بەرمنەدە .
PFX T 0 بەرمنەئە .
PFX T 0 بەرتنەدە .
PFX T 0 بەرتنەئە .
PFX T 0 بەرینەدە .
PFX T 0 بەرینەئە .
PFX T 0 بەرماننەدە .
PFX T 0 بەرماننەئە .
PFX T 0 بەرتاننەدە .
PFX T 0 بەرتاننەئە .
PFX T 0 بەریاننەدە .
PFX T 0 بەریاننەئە .
PFX T 0 لێمنەدە .
PFX T 0 لێمنەئە .
PFX T 0 لێتنەدە .
PFX T 0 لێتنەئە .
PFX T 0 لێینەدە .
PFX T 0 لێینەئە .
PFX T 0 لێماننەدە .
PFX T 0 لێماننەئە .
PFX T 0 لێتاننەدە .
PFX T 0 لێتاننەئە .
PFX T 0 لێیاننەدە .
PFX T 0 لێیاننەئە .
PFX T 0 هەڵمنەدە .
PFX T 0 هەڵمنەئە .
PFX T 0 هەڵتنەدە .
PFX T 0 هەڵتنەئە .
PFX T 0 هەڵینەدە .
PFX T 0 هەڵینەئە .
PFX T 0 هەڵماننەدە .
PFX T 0 هەڵماننەئە .
PFX T 0 هەڵتاننەدە .
PFX T 0 هەڵتاننەئە .
PFX T 0 هەڵیاننەدە .
PFX T 0 هەڵیاننەئە .
PFX T 0 وێمنەدە .
PFX T 0 وێمنەئە .
PFX T 0 وێتنەدە .
PFX T 0 وێتنەئە .
PFX T 0 وێینەدە .
PFX T 0 وێینەئە .
PFX T 0 وێماننەدە .
PFX T 0 وێماننەئە .
PFX T 0 وێتاننەدە .
PFX T 0 وێتاننەئە .
PFX T 0 وێیاننەدە .
PFX T 0 وێیاننەئە .
PFX T 0 وەرمنەدە .
PFX T 0 وەرمنەئە .
PFX T 0 وەرتنەدە .
PFX T 0 وەرتنەئە .
PFX T 0 وەرینەدە .
PFX T 0 وەرینەئە .
PFX T 0 وەرماننەدە .
PFX T 0 وەرماننەئە .
PFX T 0 وەرتاننەدە .
PFX T 0 وەرتاننەئە .
PFX T 0 وەریاننەدە .
PFX T 0 وەریاننەئە .
PFX T 0 ڕۆمنەدە .
PFX T 0 ڕۆمنەئە .
PFX T 0 ڕۆتنەدە .
PFX T 0 ڕۆتنەئە .
PFX T 0 ڕۆینەدە .
PFX T 0 ڕۆینەئە .
PFX T 0 ڕۆماننەدە .
PFX T 0 ڕۆماننەئە .
PFX T 0 ڕۆتاننەدە .
PFX T 0 ڕۆتاننەئە .
PFX T 0 ڕۆیاننەدە .
PFX T 0 ڕۆیاننەئە .
PFX T 0 وێکمنەدە .
PFX T 0 وێکمنەئە .
PFX T 0 وێکتنەدە .
PFX T 0 وێکتنەئە .
PFX T 0 وێکینەدە .
PFX T 0 وێکینەئە .
PFX T 0 وێکماننەدە .
PFX T 0 وێکماننەئە .
PFX T 0 وێکتاننەدە .
PFX T 0 وێکتاننەئە .
PFX T 0 وێکیاننەدە .
PFX T 0 وێکیاننەئە .
PFX T 0 لێکمنەدە .
PFX T 0 لێکمنەئە .
PFX T 0 لێکتنەدە .
PFX T 0 لێکتنەئە .
PFX T 0 لێکینەدە .
PFX T 0 لێکینەئە .
PFX T 0 لێکماننەدە .
PFX T 0 لێکماننەئە .
PFX T 0 لێکتاننەدە .
PFX T 0 لێکتاننەئە .
PFX T 0 لێکیاننەدە .
PFX T 0 لێکیاننەئە .
PFX T 0 بم .
PFX T 0 بت .
PFX T 0 بی .
PFX T 0 بمان .
PFX T 0 بتان .
PFX T 0 بیان .
PFX T 0 مەم .
PFX T 0 مەت .
PFX T 0 مەی .
PFX T 0 مەمان .
PFX T 0 مەتان .
PFX T 0 مەیان .
PFX T 0 پێمب .
PFX T 0 پێممە .
PFX T 0 پێتب .
PFX T 0 پێتمە .
PFX T 0 پێیب .
PFX T 0 پێیمە .
PFX T 0 پێمانب .
PFX T 0 پێمانمە .
PFX T 0 پێتانب .
PFX T 0 پێتانمە .
PFX T 0 پێیانب .
PFX T 0 پێیانمە .
PFX T 0 پێکمب .
PFX T 0 پێکممە .
PFX T 0 پێکتب .
PFX T 0 پێکتمە .
PFX T 0 پێکیب .
PFX T 0 پێکیمە .
PFX T 0 پێکمانب .
PFX T 0 پێکمانمە .
PFX T 0 پێکتانب .
PFX T 0 پێکتانمە .
PFX T 0 پێکیانب .
PFX T 0 پێکیانمە .
PFX T 0 تێمب .
PFX T 0 تێممە .
PFX T 0 تێتب .
PFX T 0 تێتمە .
PFX T 0 تێیب .
PFX T 0 تێیمە .
PFX T 0 تێمانب .
PFX T 0 تێمانمە .
PFX T 0 تێتانب .
PFX T 0 تێتانمە .
PFX T 0 تێیانب .
PFX T 0 تێیانمە .
PFX T 0 تێکمب .
PFX T 0 تێکممە .
PFX T 0 تێکتب .
PFX T 0 تێکتمە .
PFX T 0 تێکیب .
PFX T 0 تێکیمە .
PFX T 0 تێکمانب .
PFX T 0 تێکمانمە .
PFX T 0 تێکتانب .
PFX T 0 تێکتانمە .
PFX T 0 تێکیانب .
PFX T 0 تێکیانمە .
PFX T 0 دامب .
PFX T 0 داممە .
